en: Frozen beef knuckle
fr: Jarret de boeuf surgelé

en: Beef marrowbone, beef marrow bone
fr: Os à moelle

en: Frozen beef marrowbone, Frozen beef marrow bone
fr: Os à moelle surgelé

en: Beef oxtail
fr: Queue de boeuf
hr: Goveđi volovski rep
ja: 牛テール
lt: Jautienos uodega

en: Boiled beef oxtail, Beef oxtail cooked in water
fr: Queue de boeuf bouillie, Queue de boeuf cuite à l'eau
hr: Kuhani goveđi volovski rep
lt: Virta jautienos uodega

en: Beef rib steak
fr: Entrecôte de boeuf
hr: Odrezak od goveđih rebara
lt: Jautienos šonkauliukų kepsnys

en: Frozen beef rib steak
fr: Entrecôte de boeuf surgelée

en: Grilled lean beef rib steak, Pan-fried lean beef rib steak
fr: Entrecôte de boeuf partie maigre grillée, Entrecôte de boeuf partie maigre poêlée

en: Beef ribs
bg: Говежди ребра
fr: Côtes de boeuf
hr: Goveđa rebra
lt: Jautienos šonkauliukai

en: Frozen beef ribs
fr: Côtes de boeuf surgelées

en: Marbled beef ribs
fr: Côtes de boeuf marbrées

en: Frozen marbled beef ribs
fr: Côtes de boeuf marbrées surgelées

en: Beef short ribs
fr: Plats de côtes de boeuf
hr: Goveđa kratka rebra
ja: 牛ササミ
lt: Jautienos trumpi šonkauliukai

en: Braised beef short ribs
fr: Plat de côtes de boeuf braisées
hr: Pirjana govedina kratka rebra
lt: Troškinti jautienos trumpi šonkauliukai

en: Beef heart
bg: Говеждо сърце
fr: Coeur de boeuf
hr: Goveđe srce
ja: 牛ハツ
lt: Jautienos širdis

en: Cooked beef heart
fr: Coeur de boeuf cuit
hr: Kuhano goveđe srce
lt: Kepta jautienos širdis

en: Beef kidney
fr: Rognon de boeuf
hr: Goveđi bubreg
ja: 牛レバー
lt: Jautienos inkstai

en: Cooked beef kidney
fr: Rognon de boeuf cuit
hr: Kuhani goveđi bubreg
lt: Kepti jautienos inkstai

en: Beef front quarter
fr: Quartier avant de boeuf

en: Frozen beef front quarter
fr: Quartier avant de boeuf surgelé